Maine, session 132, LD2154.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1730-B is enacted to read:
§1730-B. Health Information Technology Fund
The Health Information Technology Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is
established within the department.
1. Use of fund. The fund must be used to support the operation and sustainability of
a state-designated statewide health information exchange operated in accordance with
section 1711-C, subsection 18 and to meet the State's matching fund requirements to obtain
federal funding to support the operation and sustainability of such an exchange. Funds
received pursuant to subsection 2 may be used only for purposes directly related to the
operation and sustainability of a state-designated statewide health information exchange.
The department shall administer the fund in a manner that maximizes eligibility for
available federal matching funds.
2. Source of funds; separate account; interest; nonlapsing fund. The fund is
administered by the department. The fund consists of money appropriated or allocated by
the Legislature, federal funds, grants, gifts and other funds from public or private sources.
The fund must be held separate and apart from all other money, funds and accounts.
Interest earned by the fund must be credited to the fund. Any unexpended balances
remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year do not lapse and must be carried forward
to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 2. Transfer of settlement funds. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, the State Controller shall transfer $350,000 from the Administration -
Attorney General, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of the
Attorney General from funds received from settlement agreements to the unappropriated
surplus of the General Fund no later than June 30, 2027.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
Page 1 - 132LR2753(07)

HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Health Information Technology Fund N565
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to support the operations of a state-designated
statewide health information exchange and to meet the State's matching fund requirements
for available federal funding.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $350,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $350,000
Page 2 - 132LR2753(07)